District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.14

Delivery of prisoners to Marshal.

It shall be the duty of the Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail to receive such prisoners and to deliver them to the Marshal or his duly authorized deputy, on the written request of either, for the purpose of taking them before any court or judicial officer, as provided in § 24-201.13.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1379, ch. 854, § 1194
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192

History

1981 Ed., § 24-414.
1973 Ed., § 24-414.

Prior Codifications